Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201666-1012
Act, how cited.

Sections
66-1012 to 66-1019.01 shall be known
and may be cited as the Low-Income Home Energy Conservation Act.

Laws 2008, LB1001, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB385, § 1.

July 1, 2019